Washington statutes.
RCW 18.300.040

Requirements for issuance of license.

Upon completion of an application approved by the department and payment of the proper fee, the director shall issue the appropriate location license to any person who completes an application approved by the department, provides certification of insurance, and provides payment of the proper fee.

[ 2009 c 412 s 5.]